Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
486N

HEALTH
CLUBS

Section

486N-1 Definitions

486N-2 Exemptions

486N-3 Written contract required

486N-4 Copy of contract to buyer

486N-5 Contents of contracts

486N-6 Right of cancellation

486N-7 Cancellation for death or disability

486N-7.5 Military personnel; federal active
duty deployment

outside State; cancellation or suspension
of contract

486N-8 Duration of contracts

486N-8.5 Payment of contract price

486N-9 List of equipment and services required

486N-10 Preoperative requirements

486N-11 Violation; remedies

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next